Hawaii statutes.
§386-154 Charge against employers not
insured under section 386-121(a)(1). (a) As used in this section:

"Anticipated total assessment" means
the amount derived by dividing the total amount of the levy to be paid by
insurance carriers in a calendar year as required by section 386-153 by the
most recent carrier's compensation ratio.

"Average annual compensation" means
the average of annual compensation payments made by an employing unit for a
period consisting of two consecutive calendar years immediately preceding the
year for which the charge is assessed under this section; provided that if, at
the end of a calendar year, an employing unit was subject to this chapter for a
period less than twelve consecutive months the total amount of compensation payments
made by the employing unit during such period shall constitute the employing
unit's average annual compensation.

"Carrier's compensation ratio" means
the quotient derived by dividing the total average annual compensation paid
during the two most recent calendar years by all insurance carriers on behalf
of employers insured and keeping insured under section 386-121(a)(1) by the
total average annual compensation paid during the same two calendar years by
all employers subject to this chapter.

"Employing unit" means an employer
who has not secured compensation to the employer's employees under section
386-121(a)(1); except that, for employers who are members of a workers'
compensation group under part VI, the term means the group.

"Employing unit's compensation ratio"
means the percentage ratio derived by dividing an employing unit's average
annual compensation at the end of a calendar year by the total average annual
compensation paid during the same two calendar years by all employers subject
to this chapter.

(b) For the calendar year 1974 and for each
calendar year thereafter an employing unit shall, except as otherwise provided
in section 386-152, pay into the special compensation fund a charge in an
amount which is equal to the product derived by multiplying the employing
unit's most recent compensation ratio by the most recent anticipated total
assessment.

For each calendar year the director shall
determine the amount of the charge to be paid by each employing unit, and shall
give notice of such charge to each employing unit by August 15 of the year
for which the charge is assessed. The amount of the charge shall be paid to
the director on or before September 30 following notification.

The director of finance may withhold the
additional charge due from a political subdivision from any moneys due the
subdivision from the State if the subdivision has not paid its charge as
required by this section and shall deposit the withheld amount in the special
compensation fund. [L 1963, c 103, pt of §1; Supp, §97-143; HRS §386-154; am L
1973, c 183, §4; am L 1982, c 51, §2 and c 204, §8; am L 1983, c 124, §17; gen
ch 1985; am L 1986, c 304, §5; am L 1993, c 123, §1]

Revision
Note

In subsection (a), definitions rearranged pursuant
to §23G-15.

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next